Utah statutes.
57-2a-5.   Certificate.

A person taking an acknowledgment shall cause a certificate in a form acceptable under Section 57-2a-6 or 57-2a-7 to be endorsed on or attached to the document or other written instrument.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 1988 General Session

